District of Columbia statutes.
Repealed

46-719

Crediting of payments under support orders.

Repealed.

July 10, 1957, 71 Stat. 288, Pub. L. 85-94, § 19
Feb. 9, 1996, D.C. Law 11-81, § 902, 42 DCR 6748

History

1981 Ed., § 30-319.
1973 Ed., § 30-319.

Prior Codifications